hr-HR: Premaz kontakata konektora: Krom; Bakar; Zlatna; Nikal; Rodij; Srebrna; Lim; Neobrađeno; Cink; Ostalo
de: Steckerkontaktbeschichtung: Chrom; Kupfer; Gold; Nickel; Rhodium; Silber; Blechdose; Unbeschichtet; Zink; Sonstiges
sv: Kontaktplätering: Krom; Koppar; Gyllene; Nickel; Rodium; Silver; Burk; Opläterad; Zink; Övrigt
da: Stikkontaktbelægning: Krom; Kobber; Guld; Nikkel; Rhodium; Sølv; Tindåse; Ubelagt; Zink; Andet
ro-RO: Placare contacte conector: Crom; Cupru; Auriu; Nichel; Rodiu; Silver; Staniu; Neplacat; Zinc; Altele
pl: Powłoka styków złącza: Chrome; Miedź; Złoty; Nikiel; Rodowane; Srebrny; Cyna; Niepowlekane; Cynk; Inne
en: Connector contact plating: Chrome; Copper; Gold; Nickel; Rhodium; Silver; Tin; Unplated; Zinc; Other
pt-PT: Revestimento dos contactos do conector: Cromado; Cobre; Ouro; Níquel; Ródio; Prata; Lata; Sem revestimento; Zinco; Outro
fi: Liittimen kontaktipinnoitus: Kromi; Kupari; Kulta; Nikkeli; Rodium; Hopea; Tölkki; Pinnoittamaton; Sinkki; Muu
ko: 커넥터 접점 도금: 크로뮴; 구리; 금색; 니켈; 로듐; 은색; 통조림; 도금 안 됨; 아연; 기타
vi: Lớp mạ tiếp điểm đầu nối: Chrome; Màu đồng đỏ; Màu vàng; Niken; Rhodi; Bạc; Hộp thiếc; Không mạ; Kẽm; Khác
fr: Revêtement des contacts du connecteur: Chrome; Cuivre; Or; Nickel; Rhodium; Argent; Étain; Non plaqué; Zinc; Autre
tr: Konnektör kontak kaplaması: Krom; Bakır; Altın; Nikel; Rodyum; Gümüş; Teneke; Kaplanmamış; Çinko; Diğer
it: Placcatura dei contatti del connettore: Cromo; Rame; Oro; Nickel; Rodio; Argento; Stagno; Non placcato; Zinco; Altro
bg-BG: Покритие на контактите на конектора: Хром; Мед; Златно; Никел; Родий; Сребро; Консерва; Без покритие; Цинк; Други
cs: Pokovení kontaktů konektoru: Chrom; Měděná; Zlatá; Nikl; Rhodium; Stříbrná; Konzerva; Nepokovené; Zinek; Jiné
ja: コネクター接点のメッキ: クロム; コッパー; ゴールド; ニッケル; ロジウム; シルバー; 缶; 無メッキ; 亜鉛; その他
ru: Покрытие контактов разъема: Хром; Медь; Золото; Никель; Родий; Серебро; Жестяная банка; Без покрытия; Цинк; Другой
sl-SI: Prevleka kontaktov priključka: Krom; Baker; Zlat; Nikelj; Rodij; Srebrni; Pločevinka; Nepremazano; Cink; Drugo
el: Επιμετάλλωση επαφών συνδετήρα: Χρώμιο; Χαλκός; Χρυσό; Νικέλιο; Ρόδιο; Ασήμι; Κασσίτερος; Χωρίς επίστρωση; Ψευδάργυρος; Άλλο
hu: Csatlakozóérintkező-bevonat: Króm; Réz; Arany; Nikkel; Ródium; Ezüst; Konzervdoboz; Bevonat nélküli; Cink; Egyéb
nl: Platering van connectorcontacten: Chroom; Koper; Goud; Nikkel; Rhodium; Zilver; Tin; Ongeplateerd; Zink; Andere
pt-BR: Revestimento dos contatos do conector: Cromado; Cobre; Dourado; Níquel; Ródio; Platinado; Lata; Sem revestimento; Zinco; Outro
th: การชุบหน้าสัมผัสขั้วต่อ: สไตล์โครม; สีทองแดง; โกลด์; นิกเกิล; โรเดียม; ซิลเวอร์; ภาชนะดีบุก; ไม่ชุบ; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Jungties kontaktų padengimas: Chromas; Varis; Auksinė; Nikelis; Rodis; Sidabrinė; Skardinė; Nepadengtas; Cinkas; Kita
nb: Kontaktbelegg på kontakt: Krom; Kobber; Gull; Nikkel; Rhodium; Sølv; Tinn; Ubehandlet; Sink; Annet
zh-TW: 連接器接點鍍層: 鉻; 紅銅色; 金色; 鎳; 鍍銠; 銀色; 錫; 未電鍍; 鋅; 其他
zh-CN: 连接器触点镀层: 铬合金; 铜; 金色; 镍; 铑; 银色; 锡; 未镀层; 锌; 其他
es: Recubrimiento de contactos del conector: Cromo; Cobre; Dorado; Níquel; Rodio; Plateado; Lata; Sin recubrimiento; Zinc; Otros
sk-SK: Pokovanie kontaktov konektora: Chróm; Meď; Zlato; Nikel; Ródium; Strieborný; Plech; Nepokovované; Zinok; Iné